District of Columbia statutes.
32-853

Contents of labor peace agreement.

(a)

The labor peace agreement shall be a written agreement between the employer and the labor organization that contains, at a minimum, a provision prohibiting the labor organization and its members from engaging in any picketing, work stoppage, boycott, or other economic interference with the employer’s operations in which the District has a proprietary interest, for the duration of the interest.

(b)

The labor peace agreement shall be enforceable under section 301(a) of the Labor Management Relations Act of 1947, approved July 23, 1947 (61 Stat. 156; [29 U.S.C. § 185(a)]) or through any other relief provided by law, including administrative and judicial relief, after the best efforts of the parties at resolving a dispute have failed.

(c)

The employer and labor organization may incorporate additional provisions in the labor peace agreement to protect the District’s proprietary interest.

(d)

An employer that performs its obligations under a labor peace agreement will be relieved of further obligation to abide by the procedures in the agreement, if the labor organization engages in adverse economic action such as striking, picketing, or boycotting the employer.

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-266, § 4, 50 DCR 412